North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-24.1 Medical Marijuana
19-24.1-04.
Designated caregivers — Registration.

A designated caregiver is not eligible to purchase, assist in the use of, or possess usable marijuana under the medical marijuana program unless the designated caregiver has a valid registry identification card.

A designated caregiver application is complete and eligible for review if an applicant submits to the department all of the following:

A photographic copy of the applicant’s North Dakota identification. The North Dakota identification must be available for inspection and verification upon request of the department.

The name, address, telephone number, and date of birth of the qualifying patient.

The name, address, and telephone number of the applicant.

The applicant’s signature and the date.

A disclosure that possession of a firearm by a person who possesses marijuana may be a violation of federal law.

An original designated caregiver authorization form established by the department which must be executed by a registered qualifying patient providing the designated caregiver applicant with the responsibility of managing the well-being of the registered qualifying patient with respect to the registered qualifying patient’s medical use of marijuana. The form must include:

The name and date of birth of the designated caregiver applicant; and

The registered qualifying patient’s signature and the date.

A recent two-by-two inch [5.08-by-5.08 centimeter] photograph of the applicant.

Any other information or material required by the department by rule.

Except as provided in section 19-24.1-04.1, a criminal history record check conducted under section 12-60-24 must be performed upon initial application and biennially thereafter and at any other time upon the request of the department. All fees associated with the criminal history record check must be paid by the applicant.

An individual convicted of a drug-related misdemeanor offense within the five years preceding the date of application or of a felony offense is prohibited from serving as a designated caregiver.

An applicant shall submit a separate and complete application for each of the applicant’s registered qualifying patients. A registered designated caregiver may assist no more than five registered qualifying patients. A registered designated caregiver who is a registered qualifying patient may assist no more than four additional registered qualifying patients.

A registered designated caregiver may not purchase or possess more than the allowable amount of usable marijuana for each of the registered designated caregiver’s registered qualifying patients and for the registered designated caregiver if the caregiver is a registered qualifying patient.

An original designated caregiver application for a registry identification card form established by the department which must include all of the following:

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 191, § 4, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 4, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-01 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 93 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 9 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213.

Section 19-24.1-04 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283; and Section 4 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2019 , House Bill 1119.

19-24.1-04.1.
Designated caregivers — Criminal history record check exemption.

The department may waive the requirement for a registered designated caregiver to obtain a criminal history record check under section 12-60-24 if the registered designated caregiver is solely assisting a registered qualifying patient whose debilitating medical condition is a terminal illness. A registered designated caregiver seeking a waiver under this section shall provide the department with a written statement attesting the caregiver has not been convicted of a drug-related misdemeanor offense within the five years preceding the date of application or a felony offense. If a waiver is issued under this section, the registered designated caregiver’s registry identification card is valid for a period not to exceed six months.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 172, § 12, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-05.
Qualifying patients and designated caregivers — Identification cards — Issuance and denial.

Upon receipt of a complete application for or renewal of a qualifying patient or designated caregiver registry identification card, the department shall verify the submitted information.

The verification methods used by the department on an application or renewal and accompanying documentation may include:

Contacting an applicant by telephone or mail, or if proof of identity is uncertain, the department shall require a face-to-face meeting and the production of additional identification materials;

Contacting the North Dakota board of medicine or North Dakota board of nursing to verify the certifying health care provider is licensed in the state and is in good standing; and

Contacting the health care provider to obtain additional documentation verifying the qualifying patient applicant’s medical diagnosis and medical condition qualify the applicant for participation in the medical marijuana program.

Upon verification of the information contained in an application or renewal, the department shall approve or deny the application or renewal.

Except as provided in subsection 5, the department shall issue a registry identification card within thirty calendar days of approving an application or renewal. A designated caregiver must have a registry identification card for each of the designated caregiver’s registered qualifying patients.

The department may not issue a registry identification card to a qualifying patient who is a minor unless:

The department receives documentation the minor’s health care provider has explained to the parent or legal guardian with responsibility for health care decisions for the minor the potential risks of the use of pediatric medical marijuana; and

The department receives documentation the parent or legal guardian with responsibility for health care decisions for the minor consents in writing to:

Allow the minor’s use of pediatric medical marijuana to treat or alleviate the debilitating medical condition;

Serve as the minor’s designated caregiver or identifies a registered designated caregiver to act as the minor’s designated caregiver;

Control the acquisition of usable marijuana and control the dosage and frequency of the use of usable marijuana by the minor; and

If serving as the minor’s designated caregiver, prevent the minor from accessing the usable marijuana by storing the usable marijuana in an enclosed, locked facility.

If the department denies an application or renewal, the applicant may not reapply for one year from the date of the denial, unless otherwise authorized by the department, and the applicant is prohibited from all lawful privileges provided under this chapter.

The department shall deny an application for or renewal of a qualifying patient’s registry identification card if the applicant:

Does not meet the requirements of this section or section 19-24.1-03;

Did not provide the required information and materials;

Previously had a registry identification card revoked; or

Provided false or falsified information or made a material misstatement.

The department shall deny an application for or renewal of a designated caregiver registry identification card if the designated caregiver applicant:

Does not meet the requirements of this section or section 19-24.1-04;

Did not provide the required information and materials;

Previously had a registry identification card revoked; or

Provided false or falsified information or made a material misstatement.

A registered qualifying patient may have no more than five registered designated caregivers.

The department shall notify, in writing, the qualifying patient or designated caregiver applicant of the reason for denying an application or renewal.

The department shall notify the following in writing:

A registered qualifying patient if that patient’s designated caregiver’s application or renewal is denied; and

A registered designated caregiver if that caregiver’s qualifying patient’s application or renewal is denied.

The cardholder may appeal a denial or revocation of a registry identification card to the district court of Burleigh County for hearing. The court may authorize the cardholder to appear by reliable electronic means.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 190, § 5, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 5, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 180, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-05 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283; and Section 5 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417.

19-24.1-06.
Registry identification cards — Renewal.

To prevent interruption of possession of a valid registry identification card, a registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver shall apply for a registry identification card renewal by submitting a complete reapplication as provided under section 19-24.1-03 or 19-24.1-04 no less than forty-five calendar days before the expiration date of the existing registry identification card.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-07.
Registry identification cards — Nontransferable.

A registry identification card is not transferable, by assignment or otherwise, to another person. If a person attempts to transfer a card in violation of this section, the registry identification card is void and the person is prohibited from all privileges provided under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-08.
Qualifying patients and designated caregivers — Voluntary withdrawal.

A registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver may voluntarily withdraw from participation in the medical marijuana program. A registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver seeking to withdraw from the medical marijuana program shall notify the department in writing no less than thirty calendar days before withdrawal.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-09.
Cardholders — Eligibility and compliance.

A cardholder shall provide the department or the department’s designee immediate access to any material and information necessary for determining eligibility and compliance with this chapter.

Failure of a cardholder to provide the department access to the material, or information as provided under this chapter may result in the department taking action, which may include the revocation of the cardholder registry identification card and referral to state or local law enforcement.

Failure of a cardholder to comply with the requirements under this section which is documented by the department, may result in sanctions, including suspension, revocation, nonrenewal, or denial of registration, and referral to state or local law enforcement.

The department shall refer credible criminal complaints against a cardholder to appropriate state or local law enforcement authorities.

If a violation of the requirements under this section is cited as a result of compliance monitoring, the department shall provide the cardholder with written notice of the findings following the compliance monitoring visit.

Unless otherwise specified by the department, the cardholder shall correct the violation within five calendar days of receipt of the notice citing the violation.

The department shall verify whether the cardholder corrected the violation.

The violation is not deemed corrected until the department provides written verification the corrective action is satisfactory.

If the violation is not corrected within the required time, the department may revoke the registry identification card of the cardholder.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-10.
Cardholders — Notification of change.

Within ten calendar days of the change, in a manner prescribed by the department, a registered qualifying patient or registered designated caregiver shall notify the department of any of the following:

A change in the cardholder’s name or address;

Knowledge of a change that would render the registered qualifying patient no longer eligible to participate in the medical marijuana program;

Knowledge of a change that results in the registered qualifying patient’s health care provider no longer meeting the definition of the term “health care provider” as defined under section 19-24.1-01; or

Knowledge of a change that renders the registered qualifying patient’s registered designated caregiver no longer eligible to participate in the medical marijuana program.

If a registered qualifying patient seeks to change the patient’s designated caregiver, the registered qualifying patient shall notify the department in writing of this change.

If a cardholder loses the cardholder’s registry identification card, the cardholder shall notify the department in writing within twenty-four hours of becoming aware of the loss.

If a registered qualifying patient is unable to make a notification required under this section due to age or medical condition, that patient’s registered designated caregiver or the individual responsible for making medical decisions for that patient shall provide the notification.

If the department receives notification of an item listed in this section and the nature of the item reported does not affect a cardholder’s eligibility, the department may issue the cardholder a new registry identification card within twenty calendar days of approving the updated information and the cardholder may pay a fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars. If a cardholder notifying the department is a registered qualifying patient who has a registered designated caregiver, the department shall issue the patient’s registered designated caregiver a new registry identification card within twenty calendar days of approving the updated information.

If the department receives notification of an item listed in this section and the nature of the item reported makes the cardholder ineligible, the cardholder’s registry identification card becomes void immediately upon notification of the department and the registered cardholder shall dispose of any usable marijuana in the cardholder’s possession within fifteen calendar days, in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

A registered qualifying patient’s certifying health care provider may notify the department in writing if the health care provider’s registered qualifying patient no longer has a debilitating medical condition. The health care provider may notify the department if a bona fide provider-patient relationship ceases to exist. Except if the bona fide provider-patient relationship is terminating due to the health care provider moving to a location where it is not suitable to continue the bona fide provider-patient relationship, the qualifying patient’s registry identification card becomes void immediately upon the health care provider’s notification of the department. If the bona fide provider-patient relationship is terminating due to the health care provider moving to a location where it is not suitable to continue the bona fide provider-patient relationship, the qualifying patient’s registry identification card is void if the registered qualifying patient fails to establish a new bona fide provider-patient relationship within sixty days of the department receiving notice from the original health care provider. If the registry identification card is voided under this subsection, the registered qualifying patient shall dispose of any usable marijuana in the cardholder’s possession within fifteen calendar days, in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 190, § 6, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 6, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 13, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-10 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283; and Section 6 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417.

19-24.1-11.
Registry identification cards.

The contents of a registry identification card must include:

The name of the cardholder;

A designation as to whether the cardholder is a qualifying patient, designated caregiver, or compassion center agent;

A designation as to whether a qualifying patient is a minor;

A designation as to whether a qualifying patient or a designated caregiver’s qualifying patient is authorized to use an enhanced amount of dried leaves or flowers of the plant of the genus cannabis to treat or alleviate the patient’s debilitating medical condition of cancer;

The date of issuance and expiration date;

A random ten-digit alphanumeric identification number containing at least four numbers and at least four letters which is unique to the cardholder;

If the cardholder is a designated caregiver, the random identification number of the qualifying patient the designated caregiver is authorized to assist;

A photograph of the cardholder; and

The phone number or website address at which the card can be verified.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or rule adopted under this chapter, a registry identification card expiration date must be one year after the date of issuance.

If a health care provider limits the written certification until a specified date, less than one year, the registry identification card expires on that date.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 190, § 7, effective April 24, 2019; 2019, ch. 193, § 7, effective April 24, 2019.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-11 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 193, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1283; and Section 7 of Chapter 190, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1417.

19-24.1-12.
Compassion centers.

A person may not process or produce or dispense usable marijuana or otherwise act as a compassion center in this state unless the person is registered as a compassion center.

Except as otherwise provided under this section, the department shall register no more than:

Two compassion centers with the sole purpose of operating as a manufacturing facility; and

Eight compassion centers with the sole purpose of operating as a dispensary.

The department shall establish an open application period for the submission of compassion center applications. At the completion of the open application period, the department shall review each complete application using a competitive process established in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter and shall determine which applicants to register as compassion centers.

The department may register additional compassion centers if the department determines additional compassion centers are necessary to increase access to usable marijuana by registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers.

If the department revokes or does not renew a compassion center registration certificate, the department may establish an open application period for the submission of compassion center applications.

The department of commerce may not certify a compassion center as a primary sector business.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

19-24.1-13.
Compassion centers — Authority.

The activities of a manufacturing facility are limited to producing and processing and to related activities, including acquiring, possessing, storing, transferring, and transporting marijuana and usable marijuana, for the sole purpose of selling usable marijuana to a dispensary.

The activities of a dispensary are limited to purchasing usable marijuana from a manufacturing facility, and related activities, including storing, delivering, transferring, and transporting usable marijuana, for the sole purpose of dispensing usable marijuana to a registered qualifying patient, directly or through the registered qualifying patient’s registered designated caregiver. The activities of a dispensary include providing educational material and selling usable marijuana related supplies to a registered qualifying patient or a registered designated caregiver.

An individual or organization may not hold an ownership interest in:

More than one manufacturing facility.

More than four dispensaries.

More than one dispensary within a twenty-mile [32.19 kilometer] radius of another dispensary.

An agreement may not be entered between a manufacturing facility and dispensary whereby a dispensary agrees to limit purchases or sales of usable marijuana to one manufacturing facility.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 14, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-14.
Compassion centers — Application.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department shall establish forms for an application to be registered as a compassion center. For a compassion center registration application to be complete and eligible for review, the applicant shall submit to the department all of the following:

A nonrefundable application fee, not to exceed five thousand dollars, made payable to the “North Dakota State Department of Health, Medical Marijuana Program”.

The legal name, articles of incorporation or articles of organization, and bylaws or operating agreement of the proposed compassion center applicant.

Evidence of the proposed compassion center applicant’s registration with the secretary of state and certificate of good standing.

The physical address of the proposed location of the proposed compassion center and:

Evidence of approval from local officials as to the proposed compassion center applicant’s compliance with local zoning laws for the physical address to be used by the proposed compassion center; and

Evidence the physical address of the proposed compassion center is not located within one thousand feet [304.80 meters] of a property line of a pre-existing public or private school.

For a manufacturing facility applicant, a description of the enclosed, locked facility that would be used in the production and processing of marijuana, including steps that will be taken to ensure the production and processing is not visible from the street or other public areas.

The name, address, and date of birth of each principal officer and board member, or of each member-manager, manager, or governor, of the proposed compassion center applicant and verification each officer and board member, or each member-manager, manager, or governor, has consented to a criminal history record check conducted under section 12-60-24.

For each of the proposed compassion center applicant’s principal officers and board members, or for each of the proposed compassion center applicant’s member-managers, managers, or governors, a description of that individual’s relevant experience, including training or professional licensing related to medicine, pharmaceuticals, natural treatments, botany, food science, food safety, production, processing, and the individual’s experience running a business entity.

A description of proposed security and safety measures, which demonstrate compliance with the security and safety requirements under section 19-24.1-25.

An example of the design and security features of usable marijuana containers which demonstrates compliance with section 19-24.1-21.

A complete operations manual, which demonstrates compliance with section 19-24.1-27.

A description of the plans for making usable marijuana available on an affordable basis to registered qualifying patients with limited financial resources.

A list of all individuals and business entities having direct or indirect authority over the management or policies of the proposed compassion center applicant.

A list of all individuals and business entities having an ownership interest in the proposed compassion center applicant, whether direct or indirect, and whether the interest is in profits, land, or building, including owners of any business entity that owns all or part of the land or building.

The identity of any creditor holding a security interest in the proposed compassion center premises.

The department is not required to review an application submitted under this section unless the department determines the application is complete. The criteria considered by the department in reviewing an application must include:

The suitability of the proposed compassion center location, including compliance with any local zoning laws, and the geographic convenience to access compassion centers for registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers from throughout the state;

The character and relevant experience of the principal officers and board members, or of the member-managers, managers, or governors, including training or professional licensing and business experience;

The applicant’s plan for operations and services, including staffing and training plans, whether the applicant has sufficient capital to operate, and the applicant’s ability to provide an adequate supply of usable marijuana to registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers;

The sufficiency of the applicant’s plans for recordkeeping;

The sufficiency of the applicant’s plans for safety, security, and the prevention of diversion, including the proposed location and security devices employed;

The applicant’s plan for making usable marijuana available on an affordable basis to registered qualifying patients with limited financial resources;

The applicant’s plan for safe and accurate packaging and labeling of usable marijuana; and

The applicant’s plans for testing usable marijuana and marijuana.

Following completion of the review under subsection 2, the department shall select the applicants eligible for registration under section 19-24.1-15.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 15, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 94, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 172, § 15, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-14 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 15 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213; and Section 94 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213.

19-24.1-14.
Compassion centers — Application.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall establish forms for an application to be registered as a compassion center. For a compassion center registration application to be complete and eligible for review, the applicant shall submit to the department all of the following:

A nonrefundable application fee, not to exceed five thousand dollars, made payable to the “North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Medical Marijuana Program”.

The legal name, articles of incorporation or articles of organization, and bylaws or operating agreement of the proposed compassion center applicant.

Evidence of the proposed compassion center applicant’s registration with the secretary of state and certificate of good standing.

The physical address of the proposed location of the proposed compassion center and:

Evidence of approval from local officials as to the proposed compassion center applicant’s compliance with local zoning laws for the physical address to be used by the proposed compassion center; and

Evidence the physical address of the proposed compassion center is not located within one thousand feet [304.80 meters] of a property line of a pre-existing public or private school.

For a manufacturing facility applicant, a description of the enclosed, locked facility that would be used in the production and processing of marijuana, including steps that will be taken to ensure the production and processing is not visible from the street or other public areas.

The name, address, and date of birth of each principal officer and board member, or of each member-manager, manager, or governor, of the proposed compassion center applicant and verification each officer and board member, or each member-manager, manager, or governor, has consented to a criminal history record check conducted under section 12-60-24.

For each of the proposed compassion center applicant’s principal officers and board members, or for each of the proposed compassion center applicant’s member-managers, managers, or governors, a description of that individual’s relevant experience, including training or professional licensing related to medicine, pharmaceuticals, natural treatments, botany, food science, food safety, production, processing, and the individual’s experience running a business entity.

A description of proposed security and safety measures, which demonstrate compliance with the security and safety requirements under section 19-24.1-25.

An example of the design and security features of usable marijuana containers which demonstrates compliance with section 19-24.1-21.

A complete operations manual, which demonstrates compliance with section 19-24.1-27.

A description of the plans for making usable marijuana available on an affordable basis to registered qualifying patients with limited financial resources.

A list of all individuals and business entities having direct or indirect authority over the management or policies of the proposed compassion center applicant.

A list of all individuals and business entities having an ownership interest in the proposed compassion center applicant, whether direct or indirect, and whether the interest is in profits, land, or building, including owners of any business entity that owns all or part of the land or building.

The identity of any creditor holding a security interest in the proposed compassion center premises.

The department is not required to review an application submitted under this section unless the department determines the application is complete. The criteria considered by the department in reviewing an application must include:

The suitability of the proposed compassion center location, including compliance with any local zoning laws, and the geographic convenience to access compassion centers for registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers from throughout the state;

The character and relevant experience of the principal officers and board members, or of the member-managers, managers, or governors, including training or professional licensing and business experience;

The applicant’s plan for operations and services, including staffing and training plans, whether the applicant has sufficient capital to operate, and the applicant’s ability to provide an adequate supply of usable marijuana to registered qualifying patients and registered designated caregivers;

The sufficiency of the applicant’s plans for recordkeeping;

The sufficiency of the applicant’s plans for safety, security, and the prevention of diversion, including the proposed location and security devices employed;

The applicant’s plan for making usable marijuana available on an affordable basis to registered qualifying patients with limited financial resources;

The applicant’s plan for safe and accurate packaging and labeling of usable marijuana; and

The applicant’s plans for testing usable marijuana and marijuana.

Following completion of the review under subsection 2, the department shall select the applicants eligible for registration under section 19-24.1-15.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 15, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 94, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 352, § 94, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 172, § 15, effective May 3, 2021.

19-24.1-15.
Compassion centers — Registration.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Upon receipt of notification by the department a compassion center application is eligible for registration, the applicant shall submit all of the following additional items to the department to qualify for registration:

A certification fee, made payable to the “North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Medical Marijuana Program”, in the amount of ninety thousand dollars for a dispensary and one hundred ten thousand dollars for a manufacturing facility.

A financial assurance or security bond to ensure the protection of the public health and safety and the environment in the event of abandonment, default, or other inability or unwillingness to meet the requirements of this chapter.

An update to previously submitted information, including information about compassion center agents and compliance with section 19-24.1-18.

If an applicant complies with subsection 1, the department shall issue the applicant a registration certificate.

The physical address of the proposed compassion center; confirmation the information in the application regarding the physical location of the proposed compassion center has not changed, and if the information has changed the department shall determine whether the new information meets the requirements of this chapter; and a current certificate of occupancy, or equivalent document, to demonstrate compliance with the provisions of state and local fire code for the physical address of the proposed compassion center. It is not necessary for an applicant to resubmit any information provided in the initial application unless there has been a change in that information.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 191, § 5, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 16, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-24.1-15 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 16 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213; and Section 95 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

19-24.1-15.
Compassion centers — Registration.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Upon receipt of notification by the department a compassion center application is eligible for registration, the applicant shall submit all of the following additional items to the department to qualify for registration:

A certification fee, made payable to the “North Dakota Department of Health and Human Services, Medical Marijuana Program”, in an amount not to exceed ninety thousand dollars for a dispensary and one hundred ten thousand dollars for a manufacturing facility.

A financial assurance or security bond to ensure the protection of the public health and safety and the environment in the event of abandonment, default, or other inability or unwillingness to meet the requirements of this chapter.

An update to previously submitted information, including information about compassion center agents and compliance with section 19-24.1-18.

If an applicant complies with subsection 1, the department shall issue the applicant a registration certificate.

The physical address of the proposed compassion center; confirmation the information in the application regarding the physical location of the proposed compassion center has not changed, and if the information has changed the department shall determine whether the new information meets the requirements of this chapter; and a current certificate of occupancy, or equivalent document, to demonstrate compliance with the provisions of state and local fire code for the physical address of the proposed compassion center. It is not necessary for an applicant to resubmit any information provided in the initial application unless there has been a change in that information.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2019, ch. 191, § 5, effective April 24, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 16, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 95, effective September 1, 2022.

19-24.1-16.
Compassion centers — Renewal.

A compassion center registration certificate expires two years after issuance. A compassion center may submit a renewal application at any time beginning ninety calendar days before the expiration of the registration certificate. A compassion center shall submit a renewal application a minimum of sixty calendar days before the expiration of the registration certificate to avoid suspension of the certificate.

The department shall approve a compassion center’s renewal application within sixty calendar days of submission, if the following conditions are satisfied:

The compassion center submits a renewal fee, in an amount not to exceed ninety thousand dollars for a dispensary and one hundred ten thousand dollars for a manufacturing facility, which the department shall refund if the department rejects the renewal application;

The compassion center submits a complete renewal application;

The department has at no time suspended the compassion center’s registration for violation of this chapter;

Inspections conducted under this chapter do not raise any serious concerns about the continued operation of the compassion center; and

The compassion center continues to meet all the requirements for the operation of a compassion center as set forth in this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

If a compassion center does not meet the requirements for renewal, the department may not issue a registration certificate and the department shall provide the compassion center with written notice of the determination. If a compassion center’s certificate is not renewed, the compassion center shall dispose all marijuana and usable marijuana in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 171, § 1, effective April 18, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 17, effective May 3, 2021.